tests/отбасы.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-optimised-lookup
    Gen: ../kaz.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../kaz.automorf.hfst


Tests:
  "отбасы cases":
    отбасы<n><nom> : отбасы
    отбасы<n><acc> : отбасын
    отбасы<n><gen> : отбасының
    отбасы<n><loc> : отбасында
    отбасы<n><abl> : отбасынан
    отбасы<n><dat> : отбасына
    отбасы<n><inst> : отбасымен

  "отбасы possessed forms":
    отбасы<n><px1sg> : отбасым
    отбасы<n><px2sg> : отбасың
    отбасы<n><px2pl> : отбасыңдар
    отбасы<n><px3sp> : отбасы
    отбасы<n><px1pl> : отбасымыз
    отбасы<n><px2sg><frm> : отбасыңыз
    отбасы<n><px2pl><frm> : отбасыңыздар

  "отбасы px3 with cases":
    отбасы<n><px3sp><nom> : отбасы
    отбасы<n><px3sp><acc> : отбасын
    отбасы<n><px3sp><gen> : отбасының
    отбасы<n><px3sp><loc> : отбасында
    отбасы<n><px3sp><abl> : отбасынан
    отбасы<n><px3sp><dat> : отбасына
    отбасы<n><px3sp><inst> : отбасымен
